Wyoming, session 2026, SF0050.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 41-3-939 is created to read:
41-3-939. Groundwater study to assess corrective
controls within groundwater control areas.
Subject to available funding, not less than once every ten
(10) years the state engineer shall conduct a groundwater
study in each county that has a control area designated by
the board of control under W.S. 41-3-912 and where the
state engineer has ordered one (1) or more corrective
controls under W.S. 41-3-915. The study under this section
shall assess the effect of the ordered corrective controls,
assess recharge of the aquifer compared to water
consumption from that aquifer and assess the impact of
future development on the aquifer. The study under this
section may include mapping, modeling and the drilling of
monitoring wells. The state engineer may conduct a study
under this section in counties without a control area if
deemed necessary by the state engineer. The results of each
study conducted under this section shall be made public by
the state engineer and shall be reported to the joint
agriculture, state and public lands and water resources
interim committee not later than sixty (60) days after the
study is completed.
Section 2. The initial study required under W.S.
41‑3‑939 as created by section 1 of this act shall be
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0050
ENROLLED ACT NO. 47, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
completed not later than June 30, 2030. There is
appropriated five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)
from the general fund to the state engineer's office for
purposes of conducting the study required by W.S. 41-3-939
as created by section 1 of this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning with the effective date
of this act and ending June 30, 2031. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2031. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the state engineer's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0050
ENROLLED ACT NO. 47, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3